test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-iljeTS_gt-norm.yaml
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъенась
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъедась
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъедась
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъенинзь
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъединзь
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъединзь
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъенаць
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъедаць
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илъедонзь
     илʼ+N+Tra: илӈэ
     илʼ+N+Car: [иланзиˮ, илнзиˮ]
     илʼ+N+Equ: [иландаремʼ, илндаремʼ]
     илʼ+N+Equ+Lat: [иландаревʼ, илндаревʼ]
